Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.260

Real estate appraiser commission account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5294-S.SL) ***

The real estate appraiser commission account is created in the state treasury. All fees received by the department for certificates, licenses, registrations, renewals, examinations, and audits must be forwarded to the state treasurer who must credit the money to the account. All fines and civil penalties ordered pursuant to RCW 18.140.020, 18.140.160, or 18.235.110 against holders of certificates, licenses, or registrations issued under the provisions of this chapter must be paid to the account. All expenses incurred in carrying out the certification, licensing, and registration activities of the department under this chapter must be paid from the account as authorized by legislative appropriation. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. Any fund balance remaining in the general fund attributable to the real estate appraiser commission account as of July 1, 2003, must be transferred to the real estate appraiser commission account.

[ 2005 c 339 s 20; 2002 c 86 s 241.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.